Georgia, session 2025_26, HB354.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 24-5-501 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to certain
communications privileged, is amended by revising paragraph (2) of subsection (a) as
follows:
"(2) Communications between attorney and client;, including any telephonic or electronic
communications made with such client when he or she is held in a penal institution as
defined by Code Section 16-10-56."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 354
- 1 -